Utah statutes.
20A-11-1402.   Definitions.
(1)  As used in this part:
(a)  "Ballot proposition" includes constitutional amendments, initiatives,
referenda, judicial retention questions, opinion questions, or other questions
submitted to the voters for their approval or rejection.
(b) (i)  "Labor organization" means a lawful organization of any kind that is
composed, in whole or in part, of employees and that exists for the purpose,
in whole or in part, of dealing with employers concerning grievances, labor
disputes, wages, rates of pay, hours of employment, or other terms and
conditions of employment.
(ii)  Except as provided in Subsection (1)(b)(iii), "labor organization"
includes each employee association and union for employees of public and
private sector employers.
(iii)  "Labor organization" does not include organizations governed by the
National Labor Relations Act, 29 U.S.C. Sec. 151 et seq. or the Railroad Labor
Act, 45 U.S.C. Sec. 151 et seq.
(c)  "Political fund" means a separate segregated fund established by a labor
organization for political purposes that meets the requirements of this part.
(d)  "Political purposes" means an act done with the intent or in a way to
influence or tend to influence, directly or indirectly, any person to refrain
from voting or to vote for or against any candidate for public office at any
caucus, political convention, primary, or election.
(e)  "Union dues" means dues, fees, monies, or other assessments required as a
condition of membership or participation in a labor organization.
(2)  Other terms defined in Section 20A-11-101 apply to this part.
